Utah statutes.
31A-5-204.   Organization permit -- Certificate of incorporation.
(1)  Subject to Section 31A-5-213, a person, including a stock insurance
corporation, insurance holding company, stock corporation to finance an
insurer or insurance production for an insurer, corporation to provide
management or administrative services for any of the entities named above, or
mutual insurer, may not solicit subscriptions for its securities, or in the
case of a mutual insurance corporation, solicit applications for qualifying
insurance policies or subscriptions for mutual bonds or contribution notes,
until the commissioner has issued an organization permit.
(2)  The application for an organization permit shall give the name of the
insurer to be formed and shall be signed and acknowledged by or on behalf of
each incorporator.  The application shall include or have attached:
(a)  the names, and for the preceding 10 years all addresses, and all
occupations of the incorporators and the proposed directors and officers;
(b)  for all persons planned by the incorporators to own 10% or more of the
capital stock of the corporation, their annual financial statements and
reports for the three most recent years, and if the planned shareholders are
corporations, their articles and bylaws, and a list of the names, addresses,
and occupations of all their directors and principal officers;
(c)  the proposed articles, which shall be signed and acknowledged by or on
behalf of each incorporator, and the proposed bylaws;
(d)  all agreements relating to the corporation to which any incorporator,
proposed director, or officer is a party;
(e)  the amount and sources of the funds available for organization expenses
and the proposed arrangements for reimbursement and compensation of
incorporators or other persons;
(f)  the plan for solicitation of applications for qualifying insurance
policies and for the corporation's securities;
(g)  the forms to be used for stock subscriptions, certificates for shares,
applications for qualifying insurance policies, subscriptions for mutual bonds
and contribution notes, and the forms for bonds and notes;
(h)  the capital and initial paid in surplus in the case of a stock insurer,
or the minimum permanent surplus and the additional surplus in the case of a
mutual insurer;
(i)  the plan for conducting the insurance business, including:
(i)  the geographical area in which business is intended to be done in the
first two years;
(ii)  the types of insurance intended to be written in the first two years;
(iii)  the proposed marketing methods;
(iv)  when requested by the commissioner, the proposed method for establishing
premium rates; and
(v)  the proposed aggregate compensation of the five highest compensated
officers, directors, and employees;
(j)  a projection certified by a member of the American Academy of Actuaries
of the anticipated operating results of the corporation at the end of each of
the first two years of operation, based on reasonable assumptions of loss
experience, premium and other income, operating expenses, and acquisition
costs; and
(k)  any other relevant document or information the commissioner reasonably
requires.
(3)  The commissioner shall issue an organization permit if:
(a)  all the requirements of law have been met, including the payment of fees;
(b)  all the incorporators, persons listed in Subsection (2)(b), and the
proposed directors and officers of the corporation being formed, are
trustworthy and collectively have the competence and experience to engage in
the particular insurance business proposed;
(c)  the business plan is consistent with the interests of the corporation's
potential insureds and the public; and
(d)  the bond required by Section 31A-5-205 is filed.
(4)  If the commissioner denies the application for a permit, the commissioner
shall state the reasons for the denial.
(5) (a)  The organization permit shall:
(i)  specify the minimum capital or minimum permanent surplus required under
Section 31A-5-211; and
(ii)  describe the securities or policies to be solicited under the permit.
(b)  The organization permit may contain any other information the
commissioner considers necessary.
(6)  The director of the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code shall
accept the filing of the corporation's articles of incorporation upon notice
from the insurance commissioner that all the applicable requirements of law
have been met, including the payment of fees.
(7) (a)  When the director of the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code
accepts the articles of incorporation:
(i)  the legal existence of the corporation begins;
(ii)  the articles and bylaws become effective; and
(iii)  the proposed directors and officers take office.
(b)  The certificate is conclusive evidence of compliance with this section,
except in a proceeding by the state against the corporation.
(8)  Notwithstanding Title 63G, Chapter 2, Government Records Access and
Management Act, the permit applicant may request that any part of the
information supplied under Subsection (2) be kept confidential.  The
information shall then be kept confidential unless the commissioner expressly
finds, after a hearing, that the interest of the corporation or the public
requires that the information be open to the public.
